Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 1. Oil and Gas Production Tax.
Sec. 43.55.023.
Tax credits for certain losses and expenditures.

A producer or explorer may take a tax credit for a qualified capital expenditure as follows:

notwithstanding that a qualified capital expenditure may be a deductible lease expenditure for purposes of calculating the production tax value of oil and gas under AS

43.55.160(a)

, unless a credit for that expenditure is taken under former AS

43.20.043

or AS

43.55.025

, a producer or explorer that incurs a qualified capital expenditure may also elect to apply a tax credit against a tax levied by AS

43.55.011(e)

in the amount of 10 percent of that expenditure;

a producer or explorer may take a credit for a qualified capital expenditure incurred in connection with geological or geophysical exploration or in connection with an exploration well only if the producer or explorer

agrees, in writing, to the applicable provisions of AS

43.55.025

(f)(2); and

submits to the Department of Natural Resources all data that would be required to be submitted under AS

43.55.025(f)(2)

;

a credit for a qualified capital expenditure incurred to explore for, develop, or produce oil or gas deposits located

north of 68 degrees North latitude may be taken only if the expenditure is incurred before January 1, 2014;

in the Cook Inlet sedimentary basin may be taken only if the expenditure is incurred before January 1, 2018.

[Repealed, § 30 ch 3 SSSLA 2017.]

A credit or portion of a credit under this section

may not be used to reduce a person’s tax liability under AS

43.55.011(e)

for any calendar year below zero;

may, if not used under this subsection, be applied in a later calendar year;

may, regardless of when the credit was earned, be used to satisfy a tax, interest, penalty, fee, or other charge that

is related to the tax due under this chapter for a prior year, except for a surcharge under AS

43.55.201

—

43.55.299

or

43.55.300

or the tax levied by AS

43.55.011(i)

or

43.55.014

; and

has not, for the purpose of art. IX, sec. 17(a), Constitution of the State of Alaska, been subject to an administrative proceeding or litigation.

A person that is entitled to take a tax credit under this section that wishes to transfer the unused credit to another person or, for a credit for a lease expenditure incurred before July 1, 2017, obtain a cash payment under AS

43.55.028

may apply to the department for a transferable tax credit certificate. An application under this subsection must be in a form prescribed by the department and must include supporting information and documentation that the department reasonably requires. The department shall grant or deny an application, or grant an application as to a lesser amount than that claimed and deny it as to the excess, not later than 120 days after the latest of (1) March 31 of the year following the calendar year in which the qualified capital expenditure or carried-forward annual loss for which the credit is claimed was incurred; (2) the date the statement required under AS

43.55.030(a)

or (e) was filed for the calendar year in which the qualified capital expenditure or carried-forward annual loss for which the credit is claimed was incurred; or (3) the date the application was received by the department. If, based on the information then available to it, the department is reasonably satisfied that the applicant is entitled to a credit, the department shall issue the applicant a transferable tax credit certificate for the amount of the credit. A certificate issued under this subsection does not expire.

A person to which a transferable tax credit certificate is issued under (d) of this section may transfer the certificate to another person, and a transferee may further transfer the certificate. Subject to the limitations set out in (a) — (d) of this section, and notwithstanding any action the department may take with respect to the applicant under (g) of this section, the owner of a certificate may apply the credit or a portion of the credit shown on the certificate

against a tax levied by AS

43.55.011(e)

; however, a credit shown on a transferable tax credit certificate may not be applied under this paragraph to reduce a transferee’s total tax liability under AS

43.55.011(e)

for oil and gas produced during a calendar year to less than 80 percent of the tax that would otherwise be due without applying that credit; any portion of a credit not used under this paragraph may be applied in a later period; or

regardless of when the credit was earned, to satisfy a tax, interest, penalty, fee, or other charge that

is related to the tax due under this chapter, except for a surcharge under AS

43.55.201

—

43.55.299

or

43.55.300

or the tax levied by AS

43.55.011(i)

or

43.55.014

;

is for a calendar year before the year in which the certificate is applied; and

has not, for the purpose of art. IX, sec. 17(a), Constitution of the State of Alaska, been subject to an administrative proceeding or litigation.

[Repealed, § 67 ch 1 SSSLA 2007.]

The issuance of a transferable tax credit certificate under (d) of this section or former (m) of this section or the purchase of a certificate under AS

43.55.028

does not limit the department’s ability to later audit a tax credit claim to which the certificate relates or to adjust the claim if the department determines, as a result of the audit, that the applicant was not entitled to the amount of the credit for which the certificate was issued. The tax liability of the applicant under AS

43.55.011(e)

and

43.55.017

—

43.55.180

is increased by the amount of the credit that exceeds that to which the applicant was entitled, or the applicant’s available valid outstanding credits applicable against the tax levied by AS

43.55.011(e)

are reduced by that amount. If the applicant’s tax liability is increased under this subsection, the increase bears interest under AS

43.05.225

from the date the transferable tax credit certificate was issued. For purposes of this subsection, an applicant that is an explorer is considered a producer subject to the tax levied by AS 43.55.011(e).

Regulations adopted to implement this section must include provisions prescribing reporting, record keeping, and certification procedures and requirements to verify the accuracy of credits claimed and to ensure that a credit is not used more than once.

[Repealed, § 33 ch 10 SLA 2013.]

As a condition of receiving a tax credit under this section, a producer or explorer that obtains the tax credit for or directly related to a pipeline, facility, or other asset that is or becomes subject to regulation by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Regulatory Commission of Alaska, or a successor regulatory body shall at all times support and in all rate proceedings file to flow through 100 percent of the tax credits to ratepayers as a reduction in the costs of service for the pipeline, facility, or other asset.

An entity that is exempt from taxation under this chapter may not apply for a transferable tax credit certificate.

A producer or explorer may apply for a tax credit for a well lease expenditure incurred in the state south of 68 degrees North latitude after June 30, 2010, as follows:

notwithstanding that a well lease expenditure incurred in the state south of 68 degrees North latitude may be a deductible lease expenditure for purposes of calculating the production tax value of oil and gas under AS

43.55.160(a)

, unless a credit for that expenditure is taken under (a) of this section, AS

43.20.043

, or AS

43.55.025

, a producer or explorer that incurs a well lease expenditure in the state south of 68 degrees North latitude may elect to apply a tax credit against a tax levied by AS

43.55.011(e)

in the amount of

40 percent of that expenditure incurred before January 1, 2017;

20 percent of that expenditure incurred on or after January 1, 2017;

a producer or explorer may take a credit for a well lease expenditure incurred in the state south of 68 degrees North latitude in connection with geological or geophysical exploration or in connection with an exploration well only if the producer or explorer

agrees, in writing, to the applicable provisions of AS

43.55.025

(f)(2); and

submits to the Department of Natural Resources all data that would be required to be submitted under AS

43.55.025(f)(2)

;

a credit for a well lease expenditure incurred to explore for, develop, or produce oil or gas deposits located in the Cook Inlet sedimentary basin may be taken only if the expenditure is incurred before January 1, 2018.

[Repealed, § 32 ch 10 SLA 2013.]

For the purposes of (l) of this section, a well lease expenditure incurred in the state south of 68 degrees North latitude is a lease expenditure that is

directly related to an exploration well, a stratigraphic test well, a producing well, or an injection well other than a disposal well, located in the state south of 68 degrees North latitude, if the expenditure is a qualified capital expenditure and an intangible drilling and development cost authorized under 26 U.S.C. (Internal Revenue Code), as amended, and 26 C.F.R. 1.612-4, regardless of the elections made under 26 U.S.C. 263(c); in this paragraph, an expenditure directly related to a well includes an expenditure for well sidetracking, well deepening, well completion or recompletion, or well workover, regardless of whether the well is or has been a producing well; or

an expense for seismic work conducted within the boundaries of a production or exploration unit.

In this section, “qualified capital expenditure”

means, except as otherwise provided in (2) of this subsection, an expenditure that is a lease expenditure under AS

43.55.165

and is

incurred for geological or geophysical exploration; or

treated as a capitalized expenditure under 26 U.S.C. (Internal Revenue Code), as amended, regardless of elections made under 26 U.S.C. 263(c) (Internal Revenue Code), as amended, and is

treated as a capitalized expenditure for federal income tax reporting purposes by the person incurring the expenditure; or

eligible to be deducted as an expense under 26 U.S.C. 263(c) (Internal Revenue Code), as amended;

does not include an expenditure incurred to acquire an asset (A) the cost of previously acquiring which was a lease expenditure under AS

43.55.165

or would have been a lease expenditure under AS 43.55.165 if it had been incurred after March 31, 2006; for purposes of this subparagraph, “asset” includes geological, geophysical, and well data and interpretations; or (B) that has previously been placed in service in the state; an expenditure to acquire an asset is not excluded under this paragraph if not more than an immaterial portion of the asset meets a description under this paragraph.

[Repealed, § 33 ch 10 SLA 2013.]

History.

(§ 13 ch 2 TSSLA 2006; am §§ 25 — 31, 67 ch 1 SSSLA 2007; am §§ 16, 17 ch 16 SLA 2010; am § 43 ch 8 SLA 2011; am §§ 14 — 19, 32, 33 ch 10 SLA 2013; am §§ 17 — 19 ch 4 4SSLA 2016; am §§ 6, 7, 9, 30 ch 3 SSSLA 2017; am § 99 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

Subsection (k) was enacted as (

l

); in 2008, former subsection (k) was relettered as (

l

) and former (

l

) relettered as (k).
Subsections (

l

) — (n) were enacted as (m) — (o); relettered in 2010, at which time subsection (

l

) was relettered as (o) and references in (g), former (m), and (n) of this section were conformed.

Cross references —

For provision applying the 2017 amendment of subsections (c) and (e) to tax credits and transferable tax credit certificates “regardless of when the credit was earned or the certificate was issued” see sec. 34, ch. 3, SSSLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

For transition provision relating to a transferable tax credit certificate for a carried-forward annual loss earned under former (b) of this section in calendar year 2017 and providing limitations on the Department of Revenue’s repurchase of a transferable tax credit certificate issued for a carried-forward annual loss earned during calendar year 2017, see sec. 38, ch. 3, SSSLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

For transition provision relating to the ability of a taxpayer who qualifies for a carried-forward annual loss credit under former (b) of this section for a carried-forward annual loss incurred before January 1, 2018, to apply for a credit or tax credit certificate under (d) of this section, “subject to the requirements of
AS

43.55.160(d)

and (e), as those subsections read on” December 31, 2017, see sec. 39,
ch. 3, SSSLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For production tax value of oil and gas, see 15 AAC 55, art. 2.

For tax credits, see 15 AAC 55, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (a)(1), deleted “AS 38,05.180(i), AS

41.09.010

,” following “is taken under”, substituted “10 percent” for “20 percent”, added (a)(3)(B); in (b), in the introductory language, in the fourth sentence inserted “and before January 1, 2017,” preceding “to explore for”, added the fifth sentence, added (b)(2); in (

l

)(1), deleted “AS 38,05.180(i), AS

41.09.010

,”, in (

l

)(1)(A), substituted “incurred before January 1, 2017;” for “; a tax credit under this paragraph may be applied for a single calendar year”, added (

l

)(1)(B); added (

l

)(3).

The 2017 amendment, effective July 28, 2017, in (c), added the (c)(1) — (3) designations, in (c)(2), substituted “may, if” for “, and any unused credit or portion of a credit” and deleted “may” preceding “be applied, added (c)(3); in (e), added the (e)(1) — (2) designations, in (e)(1), deleted “only” at the beginning, substituted “; however” for “, however”, inserted “under this paragraph” following “may not be applied”, substituted “paragraph” for “subsection” near the end; added (e)(2), and made related changes; and, effective retroactively to July 1, 2017, in (d), in the first sentence, inserted “, for a credit for a lease expenditure incurred before July 1, 2017,”
following “to another person or”.

The 2017 amendment, effective January 1, 2018, repealed (b).

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in (a)(1), inserted “former” following “taken under”.

Editor's notes. —

Sec. 35(b), ch. 10, SLA 2013 makes the addition of subsection (p) and the 2013 amendments to (a)(1), (d), (g), and (n) of this section applicable to expenditures incurred on and after January 1, 2013.

Sec. 38, ch. 10, SLA 2013 makes the addition of subsection (p), the repeal of subsection (m), and the 2013 amendments to (a)(1), (d), (g), and (n) of this section retroactive to January 1, 2013.

Under sec. 42,
ch. 3, SSSLA 2017, the 2017 amendment to (d) of this section is retroactive to July 1, 2017.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 10, SLA 2013 (SB 21), see 2013 Senate Journal 33 — 36.

Sec. 43.55.024.
Additional nontransferable tax credits.

For a calendar year for which a producer’s tax liability under AS

43.55.011(e)

on oil and gas produced from leases or properties outside the Cook Inlet sedimentary basin, no part of which is north of 68 degrees North latitude, exceeds zero before application of any credits under this chapter, a producer that is qualified under (e) of this section may apply a tax credit against that liability of not more than $6,000,000.

A producer may not take a tax credit under (a) of this section for any calendar year after the later of

2016; or

the ninth calendar year after the calendar year during which the producer first has commercial oil or gas production before May 1, 2016, from at least one lease or property in the state outside the Cook Inlet sedimentary basin, no part of which is north of 68 degrees North latitude, if the producer did not have commercial oil or gas production from a lease or property in the state outside the Cook Inlet sedimentary basin, no part of which is north of 68 degrees North latitude, before April 1, 2006.

For a calendar year for which a producer’s tax liability under AS

43.55.011(e)

exceeds zero before application of any credits under this chapter, other than a credit under (a) of this section but after application of any credit under (a) of this section, a producer that is qualified under (e) of this section and whose average amount of oil and gas produced a day and taxable under AS

43.55.011(e)

is less than 100,000 BTU equivalent barrels a day may apply a tax credit under this subsection against that liability. A producer whose average amount of oil and gas produced a day and taxable under AS 43.55.011(e) is

not more than 50,000 BTU equivalent barrels may apply a tax credit of not more than $12,000,000 for the calendar year;

more than 50,000 and less than 100,000 BTU equivalent barrels may apply a tax credit of not more than $12,000,000 multiplied by the following fraction for the calendar year:

A producer may not take a tax credit under (c) of this section for any calendar year after the later of

2016; or

if the producer did not have commercial oil or gas production from a lease or property in the state before April 1, 2006, the ninth calendar year after the calendar year during which the producer first has commercial oil or gas production before May 1, 2016, from at least one lease or property in the state.

On written application by a producer that includes any information the department may require, the department shall determine whether the producer qualifies for a calendar year under (a) and (c) of this section. To qualify under (a) and (c) of this section, a producer must demonstrate that its operation in the state or its ownership of an interest in a lease or property in the state as a distinct producer would not result in the division among multiple producer entities of any production tax liability under AS

43.55.011(e)

that reasonably would be expected to be attributed to a single producer if the tax credit provisions of (a) or (c) of this section did not exist.

A tax credit authorized by (a) of this section may not be applied to reduce a producer’s tax liability for any calendar year under AS

43.55.011(e)

on oil and gas produced from leases or properties outside the Cook Inlet sedimentary basin, no part of which is north of 68 degrees North latitude, below zero.

A tax credit authorized by (c) of this section may not be applied to reduce a producer’s tax liability for any calendar year under AS

43.55.011(e)

below zero.

An unused tax credit or portion of a tax credit under this section is not transferable and may not be carried forward for use in a later calendar year.

A producer may apply against the producer’s tax liability for the calendar year under AS

43.55.011(e)

a tax credit of $5 for each barrel of oil taxable under AS

43.55.011(e)

that receives a reduction in the gross value at the point of production under AS

43.55.160(f)

or (g) and that is produced during a calendar year after December 31, 2013. A tax credit authorized by this subsection may not reduce a producer’s tax liability for a calendar year under AS 43.55.011(e) below zero.

A producer may apply against the producer’s tax liability for the calendar year under AS

43.55.011(e)

a tax credit in the amount specified in this subsection for each barrel of oil taxable under AS

43.55.011(e)

that does not receive a reduction in the gross value at the point of production under AS

43.55.160(f)

or (g) and that is produced during a calendar year after December 31, 2013, from leases or properties north of 68 degrees North latitude. A tax credit under this subsection may not reduce a producer’s tax liability for a calendar year under AS 43.55.011(e) below the amount calculated under AS

43.55.011(f)

. The amount of the tax credit for a barrel of taxable oil subject to this subsection produced during a month of the calendar year is

$8 for each barrel of taxable oil if the average gross value at the point of production for the month is less than $80 a barrel;

$7 for each barrel of taxable oil if the average gross value at the point of production for the month is greater than or equal to $80 a barrel, but less than $90 a barrel;

$6 for each barrel of taxable oil if the average gross value at the point of production for the month is greater than or equal to $90 a barrel, but less than $100 a barrel;

$5 for each barrel of taxable oil if the average gross value at the point of production for the month is greater than or equal to $100 a barrel, but less than $110 a barrel;

$4 for each barrel of taxable oil if the average gross value at the point of production for the month is greater than or equal to $110 a barrel, but less than $120 a barrel;

$3 for each barrel of taxable oil if the average gross value at the point of production for the month is greater than or equal to $120 a barrel, but less than $130 a barrel;

$2 for each barrel of taxable oil if the average gross value at the point of production for the month is greater than or equal to $130 a barrel, but less than $140 a barrel;

$1 for each barrel of taxable oil if the average gross value at the point of production for the month is greater than or equal to $140 a barrel, but less than $150 a barrel;

zero if the average gross value at the point of production for the month is greater than or equal to $150 a barrel.

1 – [2 X (AP – 50,000)] ÷ 100,000

Click to view

where AP = the average amount of oil and gas taxable under AS

43.55.011(e)

, produced a day during the calendar year in BTU equivalent barrels.

History.

(§ 13 ch 2 TSSLA 2006; am §§ 32 — 35 ch 1 SSSLA 2007; am §§ 20, 21 ch 10 SLA 2013; am §§ 20, 21 ch 4 4SSLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For tax credits, see 15 AAC 55, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (i) and (j), substituted “receives a reduction in the gross value at the point of production under” for “meets one or more of the criteria in”.